North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-02.4 Crew Housing Permit Fees

57-02.4-01.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Crew housing facilities” means one or more lodging units or skid units, ordinarily designed for human living quarters or a place of business, on a temporary or permanent basis, which are not real property, as defined in section 57-02-04, and are not mobile homes, as defined in section 57-55-01. A group of crew housing facilities that are connected physically or by common ownership may be treated as a single crew housing facility for purposes of imposition of crew housing permit fees imposed under this chapter.

“Crew housing permit” means a right granted by a city or county to locate crew housing facilities on property within the jurisdiction of the city or county under this chapter and to enjoy attendant services and facilities provided by the city or county.

“Skid unit” means a structure or group of structures, either single or multisectional, which is not built on a permanent chassis and is ordinarily designed for human living quarters or a place of business, on a temporary or permanent basis.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 450, § 1.

57-02.4-02.
Crew housing permit fees — Fee revenue sharing with other taxing districts.

A city, for property within city limits, or a county, for property outside city limits, may impose crew housing permit fees that apply to crew housing facilities. Crew housing permit fees imposed by a city or county must be determined on the basis of the value of services and facilities provided to the crew housing facility by the city or county, or both. A city or county imposing fees under this section may share revenues from the fees with other taxing districts in which the property is located.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 450, § 1.

57-02.4-03.
Exemptions.

This chapter does not apply to:

Real property that is exempt from property taxation or subject to payments in lieu of taxes.

Mobile or manufactured homes as defined under chapter 57-55.

A recreational vehicle, camper, or camper trailer required to be licensed by the motor vehicle division of the department of transportation.

Park model trailers for which the owner has paid a park model trailer fee under section 39-18-03.2.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 450, § 1.

57-02.4-04.
Reporting requirement.

A county or city may establish reporting requirements for crew housing facilities subject to permit fees within the jurisdiction of the county or city.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 450, § 1.